Utah statutes.
4-5-10.   Food processed, labeled, or repacked at another location --
Exemption from labeling requirements by rule.
(1)  The department shall adopt rules exempting food from any labeling
requirement of this chapter that is, in accordance with the practice of the
trade, to be processed, labeled or repacked in substantial quantities at
establishments other than those where originally processed or packed, on
condition that the food is not adulterated or misbranded under this chapter
upon removal from such processing, labeling or repacking establishment.
(2) (a)  Regulations now or hereafter adopted under authority of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq., relating to the
exemptions described in Subsection (1) are automatically effective in this
state.
(b)  The department may adopt additional rules or amendments to existing rules
concerning exemptions.
